Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 6
FOREST RESOURCES AND OTHER PLANT LIFE

Article 1

Forest Resources.

Part 1

S

TATE FORESTRY COMMISSION

.

Part 1A

T

IMBER HARVESTING AND REMOVAL REQUIREMENTS

.

Part 2

P

RACTICE OF PROFESSIONAL FORESTRY

.

Part 3

F

OREST FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL

.

Part 4

F

ORESTRY RESEARCH

.

Part 5

H

ERTY ADVANCED MATERIALS DEVELOPMENT CENTER

.

Part 6

P

RESCRIBED BURNING

.

Article 2

Ginseng Protection.

Article 3

Wildflower Preservation.

Article 4

Harvest and Sale of Pine Straw.

Article 5

Carbon Sequestration Registry.

Article 6

Forest Heritage Trust.

Article 7

Palmetto Berries.

Cross references.

- Agricultural seeds, vegetable seeds, and other seeds, T. 2, C. 11.

Regulation of timber products,

§

2-14-80

et seq.

Preservation of sea oats,

§

12-5-310

et seq.

Trimming of trees and vegetation on state's rights of way,

§

32-6-75.1

et seq.

Provision that planting and growing of trees and fruits and products thereof shall be considered an agricultural pursuit,

§

44-14-100

.

Consent of state to acquisition by United States of lands for forest and wildlife purposes,

§

50-2-25

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Grant Programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Forestry Commission, Chapter 224-1.